Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.040

Department enforcement of licensing laws.

The department is not authorized to enforce a city's licensing laws except to the extent of issuing or renewing a license in accordance with this chapter and chapter 19.02 RCW or refusing to issue a license due to an incomplete application, nonpayment of the appropriate fees as indicated by the license application or renewal application, or the nonpayment of any applicable penalty for late renewal.

[ 2017 c 209 s 4.]